Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1249
Educational
Service Unit Coordinating Council; assistance provided.

The
Educational Service Unit Coordinating Council shall only provide assistance
in brokering or scheduling courses to educational entities that have access
to Network Nebraska. All costs to the council associated with assisting private,
denominational, or parochial schools and private postsecondary educational
institutions shall be paid by such private, denominational, or parochial school
or private postsecondary educational institution. Any services of the council
may also be offered to other public entities with access to Network Nebraska
on a contractual basis.

Laws 2006, LB 1208, § 21;

R.S.Supp.,2006, § 79-1335;

Laws 2007, LB603, § 20;

Laws 2010, LB1071, § 32.